Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 1 General Provisions

32-6-1.
Obstructing, encroaching on, or injuring public roads.

It shall be unlawful for any person to obstruct, encroach upon, solicit the sale of any merchandise on, or injure materially any part of any public road. For purposes of this Code section, the term “obstruct” shall include without limitation the causing of any buildup of rock, gravel, mud, dirt, chemicals, or other materials by continued ingress or egress of vehicles or of any natural waters dammed or redirected by diversion to an extent which presents a hazard to the traveling public.

Any person who unlawfully obstructs, encroaches upon, or injures said public road shall be responsible for reimbursing the Department of Transportation or the applicable local governing authority in the case of a road which is part of a county road system or municipal street system for the costs of removal of said obstructions or encroachments and the costs of repairs to the public road incurred by such department or local governing authority, including any costs associated with traffic management; provided, however, that such costs shall be limited to those costs which are directly incurred from such damages. Costs incurred for traffic management may include, but not be limited to, costs incurred for flagging, signing, or provision of detours, provided that these activities are directly caused by the obstruction, encroachment, or injury to the public road system. The court may, in addition to any other sentence authorized by law, order a person convicted of violating this Code section to make such restitution for the offense.

Nothing in this Code section shall abridge or limit any authority provided by law for the installation and operation of vending machines at welcome centers, tourist centers, and safety rest areas. Nothing in this Code section shall limit in any way the department’s authority to lease property to state or federal agencies, counties, or municipalities as provided for in Code Section 32-7-5, or limit the Department of Transportation’s ability to grant a license to any utility or railroad corporation as defined in Code Section 46-1-1.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-903, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 132, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1431, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 315, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1126, § 4.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding obstruction of public roads, §

16-11-43

.

Prohibition against interference with public roads and streets by mass picketing near site of labor dispute, §

34-6-5

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

32-6-2.
Authority of department, counties, and municipalities to regulate parking; parking vehicles or leaving vehicles unattended on right of way of public road on state highway system.

Notwithstanding Code Section 40-6-200 and Code Sections 40-6-202 through 40-6-204:

The department may regulate and prohibit the parking of any type of vehicle on any public road on the state highway system, including extensions thereof into or through municipalities. Whenever any state or local law enforcement officer finds a vehicle parked in violation of law or the department’s regulations, such officer or employee is authorized to move such vehicle or require the driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move the same. If the vehicle is unattended, such officer is authorized to remove or provide for the removal of such vehicle to the nearest garage or other place of safety at the owner’s expense. State or local law enforcement officers and the department are further authorized, with or without the consent of the owner, to remove or have removed any obstruction, cargo, or personal property which is abandoned, unattended, or damaged as a result of a vehicle accident which the department determines to be a threat to public health or safety or to mitigate traffic congestion, and any person or towing service that is removing an obstruction, cargo, or personal property at the location of such obstruction, cargo, or personal property upon instruction by a law enforcement officer, an official of a fire department acting under the authority of paragraph (1) of Code Section 25-3-1 or paragraph (3) of Code Section 25-3-2, or an official of the department shall be liable only for gross negligence;

A county may regulate and control the parking of vehicles on the county road system and to this end the county may place parking meters on or immediately adjacent to any or all such roads, except extensions into a municipality, for the purpose of authorizing timed parking in designated spaces upon the payment of a charge for such privilege. A county may also place such parking meters on or adjacent to any public road on the state highway system located within the county and outside the corporate limits of a municipality when authorized by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of this Code section;

A municipality may regulate and control the parking of vehicles on its municipal street system and on extensions of a county road system within its corporate limits and to this end may place parking meters on or immediately adjacent to any or all of such roads for the purpose of authorizing timed parking in designated spaces upon the payment of a charge for such privilege. A municipality also may place such parking meters on or adjacent to any public road on the state highway system located within the corporate limits of the municipality when authorized by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of this Code section; and

It shall be unlawful for any person to park or leave unattended any vehicle upon the right of way of any public road on the state highway system for over 48 hours.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-904, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 1993, p. 370, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 2-3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 12-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2007, p. 170, § 1/HB 231.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “county road” was substituted for “count yroad” in the first sentence of paragraph (3).

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

32-6-3.
[Reserved] Deposit of driver’s license with arresting officer in lieu of bail or incarceration; driver’s failure to appear before proper judicial officer; applicability of Code section to foreign licenses.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1989, § 4. For present provisions, see Code Section 17-6-11; repealed by Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 32, effective April 5, 1999.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 32 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 5, 1999.

32-6-4.
Removal of natural or manmade obstructions, cargo, or personal property during state of emergency.

State or local law enforcement officers, including fire department officials, and the department are authorized, upon the issuance of an executive order by the Governor declaring a state of emergency, with or without the consent of the owner, to remove or have removed any natural or manmade obstruction, cargo, or other personal property which is abandoned, unattended, or damaged and the law enforcement officer or the department determines such object to be a threat to public health or safety or to be contributing to traffic congestion. Any person, contractor, towing service, or other entity that is removing an obstruction, cargo, or other personal property pursuant to the instruction of a law enforcement officer, an official of a fire department acting under the authority of paragraph (1) of Code Section 25-3-1 or paragraph (3) of Code Section 25-3-2, or the department, and under the provisions of this Code section, shall be liable for damage or harm at the location where the obstruction, cargo, or other personal property was left abandoned or unattended, only when the person, contractor, towing service, or other entity was grossly negligent in the performance of his or her assigned duties; provided, however, nothing in this Code section shall limit liability for any damage or harm caused at a location different from the location where the obstruction, cargo, or other personal property was left abandoned or unattended.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-6-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 583, § 8/HB 137.

32-6-5.
Closure of or limiting access to roads due to declared state of emergency for inclement weather conditions; exception for certain vehicle operators.

The department may close or limit access to any portion of road on the state highway system due to a declared state of emergency for inclement weather conditions that results in dangerous driving conditions. There shall be erected or posted signage of adequate size indicating that a portion of the state highway system has been closed or access has been limited. When the department determines a road shall have limited access due to a declared state of emergency for inclement winter weather conditions, notice shall be given to motorists through posted signage that motor vehicles must be equipped with tire chains, four-wheel drive with adequate tires for existing conditions, or snow tires with a manufacturer’s all weather rating in order to proceed. Such signage shall inform motorists that it shall be unlawful to proceed on such road without such equipment. With the exception of buses, operators of commercial motor vehicles as defined by Code Section 40-1-1 with four or more drive wheels traveling on a road declared as limited access due to a declared state of emergency for inclement winter weather conditions shall affix tire chains to each of the outermost drive wheel tires. Bus and motor coach operators shall affix tire chains to at least two of the drive wheel tires before proceeding on a road with limited access due to a declared state of emergency for inclement winter weather conditions. For purposes of this Code section, the term “tire chains” means metal chains which consist of two circular metal loops, positioned on each side of a tire, connected by not less than nine evenly spaced chains across the tire tread or any other traction devices as provided for by rules and regulations of the commissioner of public safety.

A driver of a motor vehicle who causes an accident or blocks the flow of traffic while failing to comply with the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section when access is limited on the state highway system due to a declared state of emergency for inclement weather conditions shall be fined up to $1,000.00.

This Code section shall not apply to a tow operator towing a motor vehicle or traveling to a site from which a motor vehicle shall be towed or to emergency responders traveling the roadway in order to fulfill their duties.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-6-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1343, § 6/HB 817; Ga. L. 2014, p. 807, § 1/HB 753.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Tire chains, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Public Safety, Chapter 570-37.

32-6-6.
Camping on roadways; penalty.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “camping” means temporary habitation outdoors as evidenced by one or more of the following actions: the erection or use of tents or other shelters; the laying down of sleeping bags, blankets, or other materials used for bedding; the placing or storing of personal belongings; the making of a fire; or the act of cooking.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly use any portion of road on the state highway system or any property owned by the department for camping.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the normal, customary, and temporary use of safety rest areas, welcome centers, tourist centers, and other property of the department or state highway system specifically designated for purposes of resting, sleeping, eating, or other similar activities by persons traveling by vehicle.

This Code section shall not apply to state or local government officials or employees acting in their official capacity and while performing activities as part of their official duties and shall not apply to any employee of a contractor or subcontractor performing duties under a contract with the department.

Any person convicted of violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-6-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 372, § 5/SB 445.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references.

Information for traveling public, §

32-2-4

.